public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-xpi/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A erorar aroren/L erorar
SFX A erorar arorendo/E erorar
SFX A erorar arorene erorar
SFX A erorar aroreni/M erorar
SFX A erorar arorense erorar
SFX A erorar arorese/I erorar
SFX A erorar aroresi erorar
SFX A erorar aroresta/I erorar
SFX A erorar aroreste/I erorar
SFX A erorar aroresti/I erorar
SFX A erorar aroresto/I erorar
SFX A erorar aroreva/JLPR erorar
SFX A erorar aroreve/JL erorar
SFX A erorar arorevi/NP erorar
SFX A erorar arorevo/JL erorar
SFX A erorar arorion/L erorar
SFX A erorar arorione erorar
SFX A erorar arorioni/M erorar
SFX A erorar arorionse erorar
SFX A erorar arorisen/L erorar
SFX A erorar arorisene erorar
SFX A erorar aroriseni/M erorar
SFX A erorar arorisense erorar
SFX A erorar arorision/L erorar
SFX A erorar arorisione erorar
SFX A erorar arorisioni/M erorar
SFX A erorar arorisionse erorar
SFX A erorar arorisié/P erorar
SFX A erorar arorisiéde/P erorar
SFX A erorar arorisiége/P erorar
SFX A erorar arorison/L erorar
SFX A erorar arorisone erorar
SFX A erorar arorisoni/M erorar
SFX A erorar arorisonse erorar
SFX A erorar aroriven/L erorar
SFX A erorar aroriveni/M erorar
SFX A erorar arorivense erorar
SFX A erorar arorivion/L erorar
SFX A erorar arorivioni/M erorar
SFX A erorar arorivionse erorar
SFX A erorar arorivié/P erorar
SFX A erorar aroriviéu/Q erorar
SFX A erorar arorivon/L erorar
SFX A erorar arorivoni/M erorar
SFX A erorar arorivonse erorar
SFX A erorar arorié/P erorar
SFX A erorar aroriéde/P erorar
SFX A erorar aroriége/P erorar
SFX A erorar aroriéu/Q erorar
SFX A erorar aroron/L erorar
SFX A erorar arorone erorar
SFX A erorar aroroni/M erorar
SFX A erorar aroronse erorar
SFX A erorar arorà/ erorar
SFX A erorar aroràa/JLPR erorar
SFX A erorar aroràami/K erorar
SFX A erorar aroràau/Q erorar
SFX A erorar aroràe/JL erorar
SFX A erorar aroràelo/S erorar
SFX A erorar aroràemi/K erorar
SFX A erorar arorài/NP erorar
SFX A erorar aroràimo/L erorar
SFX A erorar aroràimoi/M erorar
SFX A erorar aroràitu/O erorar
SFX A erorar aroràndome/G erorar
SFX A erorar aroràndomene/G erorar
SFX A erorar arorào/JL erorar
SFX A erorar aroràomi/K erorar
SFX A erorar aroràrmene/G erorar
SFX A erorar aroràsimo erorar
SFX A erorar aroràvami/K erorar
SFX A erorar aroràvau/Q erorar
SFX A erorar aroràvelo/S erorar
SFX A erorar aroràvemi/K erorar
SFX A erorar aroràvimo/L erorar
SFX A erorar aroràvimoi/M erorar
SFX A erorar aroràvitu/O erorar
SFX A erorar aroràvomi/K erorar
SFX A erorar arorè/FP erorar
SFX A erorar arorème/H erorar
SFX A erorar arorèu/Q erorar
SFX A erorar aroré/FP erorar
SFX A erorar aroréa/JLPR erorar
SFX A erorar aroréami/K erorar
SFX A erorar aroréau/Q erorar
SFX A erorar arorée/JL erorar
SFX A erorar aroréelo/S erorar
SFX A erorar aroréemi/K erorar
SFX A erorar aroréi/NP erorar
SFX A erorar aroréimo/L erorar
SFX A erorar aroréimoi/M erorar
SFX A erorar aroréitu/O erorar
SFX A erorar arorémoi/M erorar
SFX A erorar aroréndome/G erorar
SFX A erorar aroréndomene/G erorar
SFX A erorar aroréo/JL erorar
SFX A erorar aroréomi/K erorar
SFX A erorar arorésimo erorar
SFX A erorar aroréu/Q erorar
SFX A erorar arorévami/K erorar
SFX A erorar arorévau/Q erorar
SFX A erorar arorévelo/S erorar
SFX A erorar arorévemi/K erorar
SFX A erorar arorévimo/L erorar
SFX A erorar arorévimoi/M erorar
SFX A erorar arorévitu/O erorar
SFX A erorar arorévomi/K erorar
SFX A erorar érora/FR erorar
SFX A erorar érore/IJLR erorar
SFX A erorar érorelo/S erorar
SFX A erorar éroreme/H erorar
SFX A erorar éroremi/K erorar
SFX A erorar érori/N erorar
SFX A erorar éroritu/O erorar
SFX A erorar éroro/JL erorar
SFX A erorar éroromi/K erorar
SFX A erotar arota/FR erotar
SFX A erotar arotada erotar
SFX A erotar arotade erotar
SFX A erotar arotadi erotar
SFX A erotar arotado erotar
SFX A erotar arotando/E erotar
SFX A erotar arotante/ erotar
SFX A erotar arotar/E erotar
SFX A erotar arotaralo/S erotar
SFX A erotar arotarami/K erotar
SFX A erotar arotaratu/O erotar
SFX A erotar arotarave/RT erotar
SFX A erotar arotare erotar
SFX A erotar arotaremo/L erotar
SFX A erotar arotaren/L erotar
SFX A erotar arotareni/M erotar
SFX A erotar arotarense erotar
SFX A erotar arotaresi/P erotar
SFX A erotar arotaresiu/Q erotar
SFX A erotar arotarion/L erotar
SFX A erotar arotarioni/M erotar
SFX A erotar arotarionse erotar
SFX A erotar arotarisen/L erotar
SFX A erotar arotariseni/M erotar
SFX A erotar arotarisense erotar
SFX A erotar arotarision/L erotar
SFX A erotar arotarisioni/M erotar
SFX A erotar arotarisionse erotar
SFX A erotar arotarisié/P erotar
SFX A erotar arotarisiéu/Q erotar
SFX A erotar arotarison/L erotar
SFX A erotar arotarisoni/M erotar
SFX A erotar arotarisonse erotar
SFX A erotar arotarié/P erotar
SFX A erotar arotariéu/Q erotar
SFX A erotar arotarme/G erotar
SFX A erotar arotaron/L erotar
SFX A erotar arotaroni/M erotar
SFX A erotar arotaronse erotar
SFX A erotar arotarà/JLNR erotar
SFX A erotar arotaràe/R erotar
SFX A erotar arotarè/JL erotar
SFX A erotar arotarèmi/K erotar
SFX A erotar arotaré/P erotar
SFX A erotar arotarémoi/M erotar
SFX A erotar arotarésimo/L erotar
SFX A erotar arotarésimoi/M erotar
SFX A erotar arotaréu/Q erotar
SFX A erotar arotaría/JLNR erotar
SFX A erotar arotaríami/K erotar
SFX A erotar arotaríatu/O erotar
SFX A erotar arotaríe/JLR erotar
SFX A erotar arotaríelo/S erotar
SFX A erotar arotaríemi/K erotar
SFX A erotar arotarò/JL erotar
SFX A erotar arotaròmi/K erotar
SFX A erotar arotase/I erotar
SFX A erotar arotasi erotar
SFX A erotar arotasta/I erotar
SFX A erotar arotaste/I erotar
SFX A erotar arotasti/I erotar
SFX A erotar arotasto/I erotar
SFX A erotar arotava/JLPR erotar
SFX A erotar arotave/JL erotar
SFX A erotar arotavi/NP erotar
SFX A erotar arotavo/JL erotar
SFX A erotar arote/IJLR erotar
SFX A erotar arotede erotar
SFX A erotar arotege erotar
SFX A erotar arotemo/L erotar
SFX A erotar aroten/L erotar
SFX A erotar arotendo/E erotar
SFX A erotar arotene erotar
SFX A erotar aroteni/M erotar
SFX A erotar arotense erotar
SFX A erotar arotese/I erotar
SFX A erotar arotesi erotar
SFX A erotar arotesta/I erotar
SFX A erotar aroteste/I erotar
SFX A erotar arotesti/I erotar
SFX A erotar arotesto/I erotar
SFX A erotar aroteva/JLPR erotar
SFX A erotar aroteve/JL erotar
SFX A erotar arotevi/NP erotar
SFX A erotar arotevo/JL erotar
SFX A erotar aroti/N erotar
SFX A erotar arotion/L erotar
SFX A erotar arotione erotar
SFX A erotar arotioni/M erotar
SFX A erotar arotionse erotar
SFX A erotar arotisen/L erotar
SFX A erotar arotisene erotar
SFX A erotar arotiseni/M erotar
SFX A erotar arotisense erotar
SFX A erotar arotision/L erotar
SFX A erotar arotisione erotar
SFX A erotar arotisioni/M erotar
SFX A erotar arotisionse erotar
SFX A erotar arotisié/P erotar
SFX A erotar arotisiéde/P erotar
SFX A erotar arotisiége/P erotar
SFX A erotar arotison/L erotar
SFX A erotar arotisone erotar
SFX A erotar arotisoni/M erotar
SFX A erotar arotisonse erotar
SFX A erotar arotiven/L erotar
SFX A erotar arotiveni/M erotar
SFX A erotar arotivense erotar
SFX A erotar arotivion/L erotar
SFX A erotar arotivioni/M erotar
SFX A erotar arotivionse erotar
SFX A erotar arotivié/P erotar
SFX A erotar arotiviéu/Q erotar
SFX A erotar arotivon/L erotar
SFX A erotar arotivoni/M erotar
SFX A erotar arotivonse erotar
SFX A erotar arotié/P erotar
SFX A erotar arotiéde/P erotar
SFX A erotar arotiége/P erotar
SFX A erotar arotiéu/Q erotar
SFX A erotar aroto/JL erotar
SFX A erotar aroton/L erotar
SFX A erotar arotone erotar
SFX A erotar arotoni/M erotar
SFX A erotar arotonse erotar
SFX A erotar arotà/ erotar
SFX A erotar arotàa/JLPR erotar
SFX A erotar arotàami/K erotar
SFX A erotar arotàau/Q erotar
SFX A erotar arotàe/JL erotar
SFX A erotar arotàelo/S erotar
SFX A erotar arotàemi/K erotar
SFX A erotar arotài/NP erotar
SFX A erotar arotàimo/L erotar
SFX A erotar arotàimoi/M erotar
SFX A erotar arotàitu/O erotar
SFX A erotar arotàndome/G erotar
SFX A erotar arotàndomene/G erotar
SFX A erotar arotào/JL erotar
SFX A erotar arotàomi/K erotar
SFX A erotar arotàrmene/G erotar
