public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
inalberar/A
inalokar/A
inamorar/A
ansar/A
arđenar/A
inarpexar/A
asalar/A
exautorar/A
babar/A
xbaɉafar/A
trabalar/A
xbaliđar/A
baƚotar/A
inbanbolar/A
baokar/A
xbarbatolar/A
xbarufar/A
dexbatedar/A
xbasegar/A
xbavixar/A
xbekotar/A
xberxeƚar/A
bexoñar/A
inbiavar/A
dexbingolar/A
biskoƚar/A
inboɉar/A
inbokar/A
xboloñar/A
inbonbaxar/A
xbordelar/A
dexbotir/A
dexbosar/A
brakexar/A
brankar/A
xbrasolar/A
briƚantar/A
xbrokar/A
inbruƚar/A
xbuelar/A
skonbusoƚar/A
buxnar/A
carlar/A
aparcèñer/A
tracéñer/A
cokar/A
dixdir/A
indebolir/A
destreɉar/A
dindolar/A
dobar/A
indolŧir/A
indopiar/A
indotar/A
indubitar/A
đaliđar/A
denerar/A
dontar/A
soraxónxer/A
dugatolar/A
èrđer/A
eliminar/A
ineskar/A
exentar/A
sodisfar/A
faldeɉar/A
fameɉariđar/A
faorexar/A
infaŧendar/A
falsifegar/A
feliŧitar/A
konferir/A
festixar/A
sfiankar/A
sfidar/A
trafiƚar/A
fioƚar/A
fiscar/A
influenŧar/A
sfojar/A
traforar/A
formigar/A	po:verb
sforsar/A
franar/A
fraskar/A
frasionar/A
frexiar/A
frondeđar/A
ŧentrifugar/A
furfar/A
dexgajar/A
dexgaletar/A
xganasar/A
ingarbir/A
garofoƚir/A
xgaxoƚar/A
xgobar/A
xgorgar/A
ingramir/A
ingranerar/A
rengrasiar/A
ingredar/A
grilar/A
ingritolir/A
xgrongolar/A
xguansar/A
guañar/A
reguxar/A
indulxentar/A
inpiñatar/A
interpretar/A
ipotixar/A
xjansar/A
xɉedoƚar/A
ɉestir/A
joŧar/A
ɉubiƚar/A
akàder/A
kajar/A
skaƚivar/A
kalpestar/A
kaluñar/A
skanbiar/A
skanpanidar/A
kapar/A
kaponar/A
inkarateƚar/A
karnevaƚar/A
kartedar/A
kaskar/A
inkateɉar/A
deskasar/A
kavaƚar/A
kaxermar/A
kogolar/A
deskokonar/A
inkoƚorar/A
inkomenŧiar/A
konfetar/A
konóser/A
inkontrar/A
koñóser/A
inkorajir/A
inkorđar/A
skorosar/A
inkotegar/A
deskovèrxer/A
skrepolar/A
krioƚar/A
krostolar/A
inkuadrar/A
interkuerar/A
intrakuirar/A
kuniar/A
kusolar/A
ƚanbikar/A
xlansar/A
xlargidar/A
xlasar/A
lèđer/A
xlénđer/A
levar/A
ƚexitimar/A
dexligar/A
sotolinear/A
ƚiveƚar/A
proƚongar/A
xlovar/A
ƚusar/A
xmacar/A
malgamar/A
mandar/A
manidar/A
marangonar/A
xmaronar/A
maselar/A	po:verb po:noun
inmatir/A
xmasar/A
destramexar/A
xmegoƚar/A
dementir/A
merkantidar/A
reméter/A
minaŧar/A
mixurar/A
mokajar/A
moltiplegar/A
tramontar/A
inmorbidir/A
xmorŧar/A
mucar/A
multar/A
mutolir/A
renàser/A
inegrir/A
ninegar/A
noƚixar/A
xnuar/A
iñarar/A
odiar/A
olir/A
onduƚar/A
dexorbar/A
orixenar/A
ovatar/A
padridar/A
inpaɉetar/A
paƚetar/A
spaƚudar/A
pànder/A
paoniđar/A
konparir/A
sparlar/A
inparŧialiđar/A
pasixar/A
konpatir/A
pasientar/A
pedaƚar/A
apelar/A
inpeƚugar/A
spénder/A
despenoƚar/A
pepoƚar/A
personalidar/A
peteđar/A
inpetrir/A
piadexar/A
pianixar/A
pikar/A
piñorar/A
piriar/A
spiumar/A
pixolar/A
polejar/A
spolveridar/A
propóner/A
strapontar/A
spontonar/A
inportar/A
potacar/A
pregar/A
presiar/A
profetiđar/A
provixar/A
despupilar/A
spuŧar/A
ragar/A
ranjar/A
irapar/A
realixar/A
inkuixir/A
dexrenar/A
rexistrar/A
irisar/A
rodar/A
irokir/A
ronkedar/A
rosixar/A
rudenir/A
ruimar/A
saer/A
sakedar/A
saleđar/A
saltelar/A
saorir/A
saxar/A
scopar/A
resekar/A
proseguir/A
desejar/A
inselvadigir/A
konsentir/A
desepeƚir/A
malsestar/A
sibiƚar/A
trasimar/A
sisolar/A
skaƚinar/A
skarpiar/A
reskatar/A
skinŧar/A
skorexar/A
skrisar/A
soaŧar/A
soƚaɉar/A
solŧar/A
soñar/A
sotiliđar/A
spalmar/A
spear/A
inspesir/A
despigolar/A
resplénder/A
spuar/A
destafar/A
stankejar/A
restaurar/A
istigar/A
restituir/A
destokolar/A
stranxir/A
striar/A
kostruir/A
stuđar/A
insubiotar/A
superar/A
tabakar/A
tajuŧar/A
intanar/A
destaponar/A
intarsiar/A
intavanar/A
destegolar/A
strainténder/A
tenporidar/A
deteñir/A
kontèñer/A
terar/A
tersarioƚar/A
tindonar/A
titubar/A
retoler/A
sintonidar/A
torkoƚar/A
tòrxer/A
tosir/A
trabatar/A
stranbaƚar/A
trasinar/A
travar/A
destreŧar/A
trigar/A
tronbiđar/A
trupar/A
stusegar/A
sapar/A
ŧekatređar/A
insefar/A
sentralixar/A
inŧeregar/A
ŧertar/A
ŧianŧar/A
ŧiganar/A
singanar/A
insiviƚir/A
supegar/A
stravakar/A
vantaxar/A
sorvejar/A
ventiđar/A
revèñer/A
xvergoñasar/A
revestir/A
vinkolar/A
vivatar/A
volđar/A
inxakoƚar/A
konxeƚar/A
xmarir/A
xustisiar/A
rexúmer/A
formolar/A
supervixionar/A
ingariar/A
poɉar/A
skuxir/A
stralukar/A
abituaƚe/A	po:adjective
